District of Columbia statutes.
31-1107

Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner shall have authority to make and enforce such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary in making effective the provisions of this chapter, but such rules and regulations shall not be contrary to nor inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 9, 1940, ch. 792, ch. III, § 57
Apr. 18, 1966, 80 Stat. 126, Pub. L. 89-403, § 1
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(3), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-1557.
1973 Ed., § 35-1367.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.